vi: Kiểu thiết kế tấm bật nhảy: Bảng nảy điều chỉnh góc; Bảng nảy gắn rổ; Đế tập luyện dây thun; Lưới nảy có khung; Đệm nảy cầm tay; Máy tập đánh xoay; Mục tiêu bật lên; Bảng phản bóng treo tường; Khác
en: Rebounder design type: Adjustable-angle rebounder; Basket attachment rebounder; Elastic cord base trainer; Framed rebound net; Handheld rebound pad; Pivoting strike trainer; Pop-up target; Wall backboard; Other
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie odrazovej siete: Odrazová sieť s nastaviteľným uhlom; Odrazové zariadenie na kôš; Trenažér s elastickým lanom; Odrazová sieť v ráme; Ručná odrazová podložka; Otočný úderový trenažér; Rozkladací terč; Odrazová doska na stenu; Iné
de: Rebounder-Designtyp: Rebounder mit verstellbarem Winkel; Korbaufsatz-Rebounder; Basistrainer mit Gummiseil; Rebound-Netz mit Rahmen; Tragbares Rebound-Pad; Schwenkbarer Schlagtrainer; Pop-up-Ziel; Wand-Prallwand; Sonstige
tr: Geri tepme tahtası tasarım tipi: Ayarlanabilir açılı rebounder; Pota tipi rebounder; Elastik kordon tabanlı antrenman aleti; Çerçeveli ribaunt filesi; Elde taşınır ribaunt pedi; Döner vuruş antrenman aleti; Açılır hedef; Duvar panosu; Diğer
fi: Rebounder-seinän suunnittelutyyppi: Säädettäväkulmainen palauttaja; Koriin kiinnitettävä palauttaja; Kuminauhakiinnitteinen palauttaja; Kehystetty palautusverkko; Kädessä pidettävä palautustyyny; Kääntyvä lyöntiharjoituslaite; Pop-up-maali; Seinälevy; Muu
th: ประเภทการออกแบบรีบาวน์เดอร์: รีบาวน์เดอร์ปรับมุมได้; รีบาวน์เดอร์แบบตะกร้า; เครื่องฝึกซ้อมสายยางยืด; ตาข่ายสะท้อนกลับแบบมีโครง; แพดสะท้อนกลับแบบถือ; เครื่องฝึกเตะต่อยแบบหมุน; เป้าหมายแบบป๊อปอัพ; แป้นบาสติดผนัง; อื่นๆ
ja: リバウンダー設計タイプ: 角度調整可能なリバウンダー; バスケットアタッチメントリバウンダー; ゴムひも式ベーストレーナー; フレーム付きリバウンドネット; 手持ちリバウンドパッド; ピボット式ストライクトレーナー; ポップアップターゲット; ウォールバックボード; その他
ru: Тип конструкции ребаундера: Ребаундер с регулируемым углом; Ребаундер-насадка на корзину; Тренажер с эластичным шнуром на базе; Сетка-ребаундер на раме; Ручной ребаундер; Вращающийся тренажер для ударов; Складная мишень; Настенный щит; Другое
zh-CN: 回弹器设计类型: 角度可调反弹器; 篮筐附加反弹器; 弹力绳底座训练器; 框架反弹网; 手持反弹垫; 旋转击打训练器; 弹出式靶标; 墙面反弹板; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta dizajna odbijača: Rebounder s podesivim kutom; Rebounder kao dodatak za koš; Trenažer na bazi elastične trake; Uokvirena rebounder mreža; Ručni rebounder jastučić; Trenažer za udarce s rotacijom; Pop-up meta; Zidna ploča; Ostalo
sv: Rebounder-designtyp: Rebounder med justerbar vinkel; Rebounder för korgmontering; Basetrainer med elastiskt snöre; Inramat reboundernät; Handhållen rebounderdyna; Roterande träningstavla; Popup-mål; Väggtavla; Övrigt
nb: Rebounder-type: Rebounder med justerbar vinkel; Rebounder til kurv; Trener med elastisk snor; Rebound-nett med ramme; Håndholdt rebound-pute; Roterende slagtrener; Pop-up-mål; Rebound-vegg; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de design al panoului de revenire: Rebounder cu unghi reglabil; Rebounder atașabil la coș; Aparat de antrenament cu coardă elastică; Plasă de rebound cu cadru; Pernă de rebound manuală; Aparat de antrenament cu lovire pivotantă; Țintă pop-up; Panou de perete; Altele
fr: Type de mécanisme du rebondisseur: Rebondisseur à angle réglable; Rebondisseur à fixation sur panier; Appareil d'entraînement avec cordon élastique; Filet de rebond sur cadre; Coussin de rebond portatif; Appareil d'entraînement de frappe pivotant; Cible pop-up; Panneau mural; Autre
lt-LT: Atšokimo treniruoklio dizaino tipas: Reguliuojamo kampo atmušėjas; Krepšio priedo atmušėjas; Elastinio laido pagrindo treniruoklis; Rėminis atmušimo tinklas; Rankinė atmušimo pagalvėlė; Besisukantis smūgiavimo treniruoklis; Iššokantis taikinys; Sieninė lenta; Kitas
pt-BR: Rebatedor design tipo: Rebatedor com ângulo ajustável; Rebatedor acoplado à cesta; Treinador de base com cordão elástico; Rede de rebote com estrutura; Almofada de rebote de mão; Treinador de ataque giratório; Alvo pop-up; Tabela de parede; Outro
cs: Typ konstrukce odrážedla: Odrazová síť s nastavitelným úhlem; Odrazová síť na koš; Trenažér s elastickým lanem; Odrazová síť v rámu; Ruční odrazová podložka; Otočný úderový trenažér; Rozkládací cíl; Nástěnná odrazová deska; Ostatní
hu: Visszapattanó kialakításának típusa: Állítható szögű visszapattintó; Kosárra szerelhető visszapattintó; Gumiköteles tréner; Keretes visszapattintó háló; Kézi visszapattintó párna; Forgó ütőtréner; Pop-up célpont; Fali palánk; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип дизайн на уред за връщане на топки: Рибаундър с регулируем ъгъл; Рибаундър с приставка за кош; Тренажор с ластично въже; Рамкирана рибаундър мрежа; Ръчна рибаундър подложка; Въртящ се тренажор за удари; Изскачаща мишена (Pop-up); Стенно табло; Други
pt-PT: Tipo de design do rebatedor: Tabela de ressalto com ângulo ajustável; Tabela de ressalto para cesto; Treinador com base de cordão elástico; Rede de ressalto com armação; Almofada de ressalto manual; Treinador de remates pivotante; Alvo pop-up; Tabela de parede; Outro
nl: Rebounder ontwerptype: Rebounder met verstelbare hoek; Rebounder met basketbevestiging; Basistrainer met elastisch koord; Reboundnet met frame; Hand-rebound-pad; Roterende stoot-trainer; Pop-up-doel; Wand-backboard; Overig
ko: 리바운더 디자인 유형: 각도 조절형 리바운더; 바스켓 부착형 리바운더; 탄성 코드 베이스 트레이너; 프레임 리바운드 네트; 휴대용 리바운드 패드; 피벗형 스트라이크 트레이너; 팝업 타겟; 월 백보드; 기타
zh-TW: 反彈網設計類型: 角度可調反彈器; 籃框附加反彈器; 彈力繩底座訓練器; 框架反彈網; 手持反彈墊; 旋轉打擊訓練器; 彈出式標靶; 牆面回彈板; 其他
pl: Typ konstrukcji reboundera: Trenażer z regulacją kąta; Trenażer odbijający do kosza; Trenażer z elastyczną linką; Siatka odbijająca na stelażu; Ręczna tarcza odbijająca; Obrotowy trenażer uderzeń; Cel typu pop-up; Tablica ścienna; Inne
el: Τύπος σχεδιασμού αναπήδησης: Ριμπάουντερ ρυθμιζόμενης γωνίας; Ριμπάουντερ προσαρτώμενο σε καλάθι; Προπονητής με βάση ελαστικού κορδονιού; Δίχτυ ριμπάουντ με πλαίσιο; Ταμπλό ριμπάουντ χειρός; Περιστρεφόμενος προπονητής χτυπημάτων; Στόχος pop-up; Επιτοίχιο ταμπλό; Άλλο
es: Tipo de diseño del mecanismo de rebote: Rebotador de ángulo ajustable; Rebotador para fijar a la canasta; Entrenador base con cuerda elástica; Red de rebote con marco; Almohadilla de rebote de mano; Entrenador de golpeo pivotante; Blanco emergente; Tablero de pared; Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta zasnove odbojne mreže: Odbijač z nastavljivim kotom; Odbijač kot dodatek za koš; Trenažer z elastično vrvjo; Odbijalna mreža z okvirjem; Ročna odbijalna blazina; Vrtljivi trenažer udarcev; Samopostavljiva tarča; Stenska tabla; Drugo
it: Tipo di design del rimbalzatore: Rimbalzatore ad angolo regolabile; Rimbalzatore con attacco a canestro; Base di allenamento con corda elastica; Rete di rimbalzo con telaio; Cuscino di rimbalzo portatile; Attrezzo per battuta girevole; Bersaglio pop-up; Tabellone da parete; Altro
da: Type tilbagespringsdesign: Rebounder med justerbar vinkel; Rebounder til kurvemontering; Træner med elastiksnor i basen; Reboundnet med ramme; Håndholdt rebound-plade; Træner med drejelig slagflade; Pop op-mål; Vægmonteret bagplade; Andet